Idaho, session 2026, H0786.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-802. SCHOOL LEVIES. Any tax levied for school purposes shall be a
lien on the property against which the tax is levied. The board of trustees
shall determine the levies upon each dollar of taxable property in the dis-
trict for the ensuing fiscal year as follows:
(1) Bond, Interest and Judgment Obligation Levies. Such levies as
shall be required to satisfy all maturing bond, bond interest, and judgment
obligations.
(2) Budget Stabilization Levies. School districts not receiving state
equalization funds in fiscal year 2006 may authorize a budget stabilization
levy for calendar year 2006 and each year thereafter. Such levies shall not
exceed the difference between the amount of equalized funds that the state
department of education estimates the school district will receive in fiscal
year 2007, based on the school district's fiscal year 2006 reporting data,
and the combined amount of money the school district would have received from
its maintenance and operation levy and state property tax replacement funds
in fiscal year 2007 under the laws of the state of Idaho as they existed prior
to amendment by the first extraordinary session of the fifty-eighth Idaho
legislature. The state department of education shall notify the state tax
commission and affected counties and school districts of the maximum levy
amounts permitted, by no later than September 1, 2006.
(3) Supplemental Maintenance and Operation Levies. No levy in excess
of the levy permitted by this section shall be made by a noncharter district
unless such a supplemental levy in a specified amount and for a specified
time not to exceed two (2) years, from one (1) year to a maximum of four (4)
years, be first authorized through an election held subject to the provi-
sions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, and pursuant to title 34, Idaho Code,
and approved by a majority of the district electors voting in such election.
A levy approved pursuant to this subsection may be reduced by a majority vote
of the board of trustees in the second year any of the years the levy is autho-
rized.
(4) Charter District Supplemental Maintenance and Operation. Levies
pursuant to the respective charter of any such charter district shall be
first authorized through an election held subject to the provisions of sec-
tion 34-106, Idaho Code, and pursuant to title 34, Idaho Code, and approved
by a majority of the district electors voting in such election.


(5) The board of trustees of any school district that has, for at least
seven (7) consecutive years, been authorized through an election held to
certify a supplemental levy that has annually been equal to or greater than
twenty percent (20%) of the total general maintenance and operation fund,
may submit the question of an indefinite term supplemental levy to the elec-
tors of the school district. Such question shall clearly state the dollar
amount that will be certified annually and that the levy will be for an in-
definite number of years. The question must be approved by a majority of the
district electors voting on the question in an election held subject to the
provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, and pursuant to title 34, Idaho
Code. The levy approved pursuant to this subsection may be reduced by a ma-
jority vote of the board of trustees during any fiscal year.
(6) A charter district may levy for maintenance and operations if such
authority is contained within its charter. In the event property within a
charter district's boundaries is contained in a revenue allocation area es-
tablished under chapter 29, title 50, Idaho Code, and such revenue alloca-
tion area has given notice of termination thereunder, then, only for the pur-
pose of determining the levy described in this subsection, the district may
add the increment value, as defined in section 50-2903, Idaho Code, to the
actual or adjusted market value for assessment purposes of the district as
such value existed on December 31 of the previous year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.